Arkansas, session 2025, HB1425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Arkansas Fire Protection
Licensing Board.
(a) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board is abolished, and its
authority, duties, functions, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds,
including without limitation the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are
transferred to the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board.
(b) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board's statutory powers,
duties, and functions, including without limitation the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds are
transferred to the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board
does not affect the orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
*SSS152*
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
standards made or promulgated by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board
before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
standards of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board shall continue to
be in effect until they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-40-103(a)(13), concerning exemptions for
private investigators and private security agencies, is amended to read as
follows:
(13) Installation of fixed fire extinguisher systems by persons
licensed by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire
Protection Services Board;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1242(c), concerning the creation of
the Fire Protection Licensing Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement as required by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board
Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties as set out in § 20-22-601 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-22-602(1), concerning the definition of
"apprentice" as it relates to monitoring the sale, installation, and
servicing of fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Apprentice” means a qualified person:
(A) Enrolled as required in an apprenticeship program
recognized by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire
Protection Services Board; and
(B) Who may perform work entitled by the licensee under
the direct supervision of a licensed employee;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 20-22-602(6), concerning the definition of
"fixed fire protection systems" as it relates to monitoring the sale,
installation, and servicing of fire extinguishers, is amended to read as
follows:
(6) “Fixed fire protection systems” means fire extinguisher or
fire suppression systems, including without limitation:
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
(A) Fire extinguishing or fire suppression systems
installed to protect the hoods and ductwork of exhaust systems designed for
the removal of smoke and grease-laden vapors from commercial cooking
equipment; and
(B) Listed or approved fire protection systems or
suppression systems installed and maintained according to the standards
adopted in the rules of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas
Fire Protection Services Board;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 20-22-603(5)(B), concerning exceptions to
monitoring the sale, installation, and servicing of fire extinguishers, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) All work is performed according to the standards
adopted and the rules of the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board
Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board and the National Fire Protection
Association pamphlet number ten (No. 10): Standard for Portable Fire
Extinguishers;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 20-22-604(a), concerning penalties for
violations of law regarding monitoring the sale, installation, and servicing
of fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire
Protection Services Board, in a lawful proceeding respecting licensing as
defined in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., in
addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action, may assess a
civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
violation of any statute, rule, or order enforceable by the board.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 20-22-605(a), concerning reports and
investigations of fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards and
Commissions and other state and local agencies and officers may cooperate
with and assist the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire
Protection Services Board in administering and enforcing this subchapter by
reporting to the board any violations of this subchapter or any failure to
comply with this subchapter or the policies adopted by the board pursuant to
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
the authority granted in this subchapter.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 20-22-606 is repealed.
20-22-606. Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board — Creation —
Members.
(a)(1) There is created the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board,
which shall be composed of eleven (11) members who are residents of the state
and who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of five (5) years. The
eleven (11) members shall be constituted as follows:
(A) One (1) member shall be an industrial safety
representative;
(B) One (1) member shall be the State Fire Marshal;
(C) One (1) member shall be a representative of a state
association of fire chiefs;
(D) One (1) member shall be a representative of the fire
insurance industry;
(E) Two (2) members shall be representatives of large
industrial users of fire suppression equipment;
(F) One (1) member shall be a representative of a
restaurant association;
(G) Two (2) members shall be active in the installation
and servicing of portable fire extinguishers or fixed fire protection
systems; and
(H) Two (2) members shall be active in the installation
and servicing of fire protection sprinkler systems.
(2) Each of the four (4) congressional districts in the state
shall be represented by at least one (1) member.
(3) Each of the members shall be experienced and knowledgeable
in one (1) or more of the following areas:
(A) The installation or servicing of:
(i) Portable fire extinguishers;
(ii) Fixed fire protection systems; and
(iii) Fire protection sprinkler systems;
(B) The manufacturing of fire suppression equipment;
(C) The fire insurance industry;
(D) The use of fire suppression equipment by the food
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
service industry; or
(E) The provision of fire suppression services by a fire
department.
(b) Each member may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in
accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(c)(1) The board may expend moneys as necessary to reimburse the
Department of Labor and Licensing for stationery, office supplies,
application forms, equipment, and other materials necessary for the board to
carry out its duties.
(2) The expense reimbursement and stipends authorized by § 25-
16-901 et seq. and the expense for necessary office supplies, forms,
equipment, and other necessary materials shall be paid from the fees and
fines collected by the board.
(d)(1) The board shall employ an executive director, chief board
investigator, and other staff as necessary whose compensation shall be set by
the board.
(2) The staff shall be paid from fees and fines collected by the
board.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 20-22-607 and 20-22-608 are amended to
read as follows:
20-22-607. Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire
Protection Services Board — Powers and duties.
The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection
Services Board shall:
(1) Formulate and administer policies as may be determined
necessary for the protection and preservation of life and property in regard
to:
(A) The registration of firms engaging in the business of
installing, inspecting, or servicing portable fire extinguishers and of firms
engaging or in the business of installing, inspecting, and servicing fixed
fire protection systems;
(B) The registration of firms engaging in the business of
hydrostatic testing of portable fire extinguishers. However, no person or
firm shall be granted a Class A hydrostatic testing certificate until the
applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that the test equipment of
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
the applicant has been tested and certified by the United States Department
of Transportation;
(C) The examination and licensure of persons applying for
a license to install, inspect, or service portable fire extinguishers and of
a person applying for a license to install, inspect, or service fixed fire
protection systems;
(D) The registration of firms engaging in the business of
selling, system layout, installing, servicing, inspecting, or any aspect of
fire protection sprinkler systems, including standpipe, fire pumps, and hose
systems;
(E) The examination and licensure of a person applying for
a license as a responsible managing employee for the purpose of fire
protection sprinkler system business, including designing, inspecting,
installing, system layout, or servicing fire protection sprinkler systems,
including standpipe, fire pumps, and hose systems;
(F) The examination and licensure of a person applying for
a license as a fire protection sprinkler systems inspector for the purpose of
servicing or inspecting fire protection sprinkler systems, including
standpipe, fire pumps, and hose systems; and
(G) The examination and licensure of a person applying for
a license as a fire protection sprinkler system sprinkler fitter or
apprentice for the purpose of installing, servicing, or placing fire
protection sprinkler systems in service, including without limitation
standpipe, fire pumps, and hose systems;
(2) Establish reasonable qualifications for firms and
individuals for the issuance of a certificate of registration or individual
license to engage in any aspect of the business of portable fire
extinguishers, fixed fire protection systems, or fire protection sprinkler
systems;
(3) Conduct examinations to ascertain the qualifications and
fitness of individual applicants to install or service portable fire
extinguishers, install or service fixed fire protection systems, or install,
service, inspect, or design fire protection sprinkler systems;
(4) Issue certificates of registration for those firms that
qualify and individual licenses and permits to individuals that qualify to
engage in the business and activity of installing and servicing portable fire
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
extinguishers, installing and servicing fixed fire protection systems, and
designing, installing, inspecting, or servicing fire protection sprinkler
systems and issue licenses or permits to those firms and individuals
qualifying to perform hydrostatic testing of fire extinguisher cylinders;
(5) Evaluate the qualifications of firms seeking approval as
testing laboratories for portable fire extinguishers; and
(6)(A) Regulate and license as a part of a fire protection
sprinkler system the installation, service, and maintenance of a standpipe
and hose system as defined under the National Fire Protection Association
pamphlet number fourteen (No. 14): Standard for the Installation of Standpipe
and Hose Systems.
(B)(i) The installation, service, and maintenance of a
standpipe and hose system shall be performed by a licensed fire protection
sprinkler contractor. A licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor is not
required to perform hydrostatic testing of the standpipe hose, repair of the
standpipe hose, or maintenance of the standpipe hose.
(ii) The standpipe and hose system shall be:
(a) Designed, installed, and tested in
accordance with the standards adopted in the Rules and Regulations for
Sprinkler Systems of the board and in accordance with the applicable National
Fire Protection Association pamphlets; and
(b) Designed by an Arkansas-licensed
responsible managing employee or a registered professional engineer licensed
by the State of Arkansas.

20-22-608. State Fire Marshal — Powers and duties.
The State Fire Marshal shall advise and assist the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board in the
adoption of policies and procedures for the:
(1) Effective monitoring of the sale, installation, and
servicing of portable fire extinguishers;
(2) Sale, installation, and servicing of fixed fire protection
systems;
(3) Design, installation, inspection, servicing, and maintenance
of fire protection sprinkler systems, including standpipe and hose systems;
and
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
(4) Registration and licensing of firms and individuals
providing these goods and services.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 20-22-609(8), concerning prohibited
actions by a person in relation to fire extinguishers, is amended to read as
follows:
(8) Engage in any business or activity licensed or permitted by
the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection
Services Board without maintaining in force at all times a public liability
insurance policy, with minimum coverage limits as set by the board, covering
the person's operations and completed operations.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 20-22-610(a), concerning the license,
permit, and certificate fees for fire extinguishers, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Applications for licenses, permits, and certificates provided for
in this section shall be made under policies adopted by the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board and shall
be submitted on forms prescribed by the board.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 20-22-611(a), concerning the license,
permit, and certificate qualifications for fire extinguishers, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) For a license to install or service portable fire extinguishers,
for a license to sell, install, or service fixed fire protection systems, or
for a license to conduct any fire protection sprinkler system business, a
person employed by a certified firm shall obtain a license issued by the
Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection Services
Board after:
(1) Successful completion of the requirements for licensure
under rules of the board; and
(2) Payment of fees established under rules of the board.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 20-22-612 is amended to read as follows:
20-22-612. License, permit, or certificate — Previously engaged
persons.
02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, if any person or
firm engaged in the business on January 1, 1977, of servicing portable fire
extinguishers, installing or servicing fixed fire protection systems, or
performing hydrostatic testing of fire extinguishers derived twenty-five
percent (25%) or more of the personal or firm income from servicing portable
fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed fire protection systems
or hydrostatic testing of fire extinguishers during the 1976 calendar year,
the person or firm shall be registered or issued a license to continue in the
business upon payment of the annual registration or license fee prescribed in
this subchapter for the particular type of business, if the applicant's
qualifications meet those requirements established by the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 20-22-613(a), concerning limitation of
actions for fire extinguishers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) No portable fire extinguisher or fixed fire protection system may
be sold or installed in this state unless it carries a label of approval of a
nationally recognized testing laboratory approved by the Arkansas Fire
Protection Licensing Board Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 20-22-803, concerning membership of the
Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) A member who fails to attend regular meetings continuously for
one (1) year may be removed from his or her position by a majority vote of
the remaining members of the board.
(2) Upon removal of a member under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section, the position is vacant and shall be filled as provided in subsection
(c) of this section.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 20-22-804(a), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(20) Oversee administration of rules and registration concerning
fire extinguishers as described in § 20-22-607.

02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152

HB1425
SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 20-22-804(c), concerning revocation of a
firefighter's certification, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board may:
(A) revoke Revoke the certification of any firefighter who
has been convicted of a felony under § 17-3-102; and
(B) Suspend the certification of a firefighter.
(2) Before the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board revokes
or suspends the certification of a firefighter under this subsection, the
firefighter may request a hearing in accordance with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(3)(A) If Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c)(3)(B)
of this section, if the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board revokes or
suspends the firefighter's certification under this subsection, the
firefighter may appeal the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board's decision
to the Pulaski County Circuit Court in accordance with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(B) If a hearing is not requested by the firefighter whose
certification is under review for suspension, the decision of the Arkansas
Fire Protection Services Board shall be final and is not eligible for appeal
as described in subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section.
(4) The Arkansas Fire Training Academy shall be the custodian of
all records on the decertification of firefighters under this subsection.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(22), concerning entities
authorized a spending stipend, is repealed.
(22) Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board;

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1102(a)(2), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing by a cabinet-
level department transfer, is repealed.
(2) The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board, created under
§ 20-22-606;




02/05/2025 3:30:01 PM SSS152